Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1671.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9721(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9721. Sentencing generally.(a) General rule.--In determining the sentence to be imposed the court shall, except as provided in subsection (a.1), consider and select one or more of the following alternatives, and may impose them consecutively or concurrently:* * *(8) Restorative justice.* * *Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9726.1. Restorative justice.<--123456789101112131415161718 (a) Restorative justice as exclusive sentence.--The court may sentence a defendant to undergo restorative justice exclusively if the court, after considering the nature and circumstances of the crime committed by the defendant and the history and character of the defendant, determines that restorative justice alone is appropriate.(b) Restorative justice as additional sentence.--The court may sentence a defendant to undergo restorative justice in addition to another sentence, involving total or partial confinement or probation, if the court determines that restorative justice is specially adapted to the deterrence of the crime involved or the correction of the defendant.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Circle." A versatile restorative practice that can be used:(1) proactively to develop relationships and build community; or(2) reactively to respond to wrongdoing, conflicts and problems."Conference." A structured meeting among individuals who have caused harm, individuals who have been harmed and the family and friends of these individuals, in which they deal with the consequences of a crime or wrongdoing and decide how best to repair the harm."Facilitator." An individual who is trained to facilitate a restorative justice practice."Restorative justice." A gathering, such as a conference or circle, in which individuals who have caused harm, individuals who have been harmed, community stakeholders and a facilitator 20250HB1671PN2820 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collectively gather to identify and repair the harm to the extent possible, address trauma, reduce the likelihood of further harm and strengthen community ties by focusing on the needs and obligations of all parties involved through a participatory process.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 42 (JUDICIARY AND JUDICIAL PROCEDURE) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN COMMENCEMENT OF PROCEEDINGS, PROVIDING FOR RESTORATIVE JUSTICE.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. CHAPTER 89 OF TITLE 42 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBCHAPTER TO READ:SUBCHAPTER ERESTORATIVE JUSTICESEC.8961. DEFINITIONS. 8962. RESTORATIVE JUSTICE. § 8961. DEFINITIONS. THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ACCOUNTABILITY." THE ACTIVE PROCESS THAT IS UNDERTAKEN BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO CAUSED HARM TO DEMONSTRATE REMORSE IN PRACTICE."COMMUNITY CONFERENCE." A CONSENSUAL HEALING DIALOGUE ORGANIZED TO ADDRESS THE EXPERIENCE AND NEEDS OF ALL PARTIES INVOLVED, AS IT RELATES TO THE IMPACT OF CRIMINAL ACTS COMMITTED BY AN OFFENDER, TO PROVIDE A RESTORATIVE PLAN TO HEAL AND REPAIR HARM."CONSENSUAL H EALING D IALOGUE." A VOLUNTARY PROCESS THROUGH 20250HB1671PN2820 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 WHICH PARTIES REPAIR THE HARM CAUSED BY THE OFFENDER AND WITHIN THE OFFENDER BY USING RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PRACTICES AND A RESTORATIVE PLAN, AVOIDING THE INVOLVEMENT OF THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM."FACILITATOR." A PRACTITIONER OF RESTORATIVE JUSTICE WHO ENTERS INTO THE RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PROCESS UNDER SECTION 8962(C) (RELATING TO RESTORATIVE JUSTICE)."RESTORATIVE JUSTICE." A PROGRAM WHICH EMPHASIZES REPAIRING THE HARM DONE TO INDIVIDUALS AND THE COMMUNITY AT LARGE BY THE CRIMINAL ACT COMMITTED BY AN OFFENDER. THE TERM INCLUDES:(1) COMMUNITY CONFERENCES. (2) CONFLICT RESOLUTION. (3) COUNSELING. (4) COMMUNITY SERVICE. (5) VICTIM-OFFENDER CONFERENCES. (6) VICTIM-OFFENDER MEDIATION. (7) FAMILY OR GROUP DECISION-MAKING CONFERENCES. (8) VICTIM IMPACT PANELS. § 8962. RESTORATIVE JUSTICE. (A) FINDINGS.--THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES AS FOLLOWS:(1) RESTORATIVE JUSTICE IS AN EFFECTIVE ALTERNATIVE TO SENTENCING INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE COMMITTED A CRIME BY PROVIDING AN OPPORTUNITY FOR THE OFFENDER TO ACCEPT ACCOUNTABILITY AND RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE HARM CAUSED AND TO ENGAGE WITH VICTIMS AND THE COMMUNITY TO REPAIR THE HARM. (2) RESTORATIVE JUSTICE HAS BEEN SHOWN TO PREVENT FURTHER CRIMINAL ACTIVITY BY OFFENDERS.(3) IT IS THE POLICY OF THIS COMMONWEALTH THAT RESTORATIVE JUSTICE BE USED WHENEVER POSSIBLE TO:20250HB1671PN2820 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) RESOLVE CONFLICTS AND DISPUTES BY MEANS OF A NONADVERSARIAL COMMUNITY PROCESS.(II) ENSURE THAT OFFENDERS ARE DIVERTED FROM AND HELD ACCOUNTABLE OUTSIDE OF THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM. (III) ENCOURAGE THE HEALING OF ALL PARTIES AFFECTED BY CRIME.(B) RESTORATIVE JUSTICE AS PRETRIAL DIVERSION.--SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C), A DISTRICT ATTORNEY, JUDGE OR HEARING OFFICER SHALL USE RESTORATIVE JUSTICE AS A PRETRIAL DIVERSION FOR ANY OFFENDER, INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS CHARGED WITH LOW-LEVEL NONVIOLENT OFFENSES, FIRST-TIME OFFENDERS, MINORS, STUDENTS AND INDIVIDUALS WITH DOCUMENTED EDUCATIONAL NEEDS OR A DIAGNOSIS UNDER THE DIAGNOSTIC AND STATISTICAL MANUAL OF MENTAL DISORDERS, 5TH EDITION: DSM-5, 2013, PUBLISHED BY THE AMERICAN PSYCHIATRIC ASSOCIATION.(C) CONSENT BY ALL PARTIES.--EXCEPT FOR OFFENSES UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 4952 (RELATING TO INTIMIDATION OF WITNESSES OR VICTIMS), RESTORATIVE JUSTICE MAY BE USED AS A PRETRIAL DIVERSION IF THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY, OFFENDER AND VICTIM OF THE OFFENDER EACH AGREE TO ENTER INTO THE RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PROCESS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) WITH A FACILITATOR.(D) RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PROCESS.--THE RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PROCESS CONSENTED TO UNDER SUBSECTION (C) SHALL INCLUDE A RESTORATIVE PLAN TO REPAIR THE HARM WHICH IS AGREED TO BY ALL PARTIES AND A TIME LIMIT FOR COMPLETION OF THE PLAN. (E) CONFIDENTIALITY.-- (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2), ALL MEMORANDA, WORK NOTES OR PRODUCTS, CASE FILES OR PROGRAMS, DATA AND COMMUNICATIONS RELATED TO THE RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PROCESS ARE CONFIDENTIAL AND SHALL NOT BE SUBJECT TO 20250HB1671PN2820 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DISCLOSURE IN ANY JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING UNLESS ALL PARTIES TO THE COMMUNICATION WAIVE THE PRIVILEGE.(2) CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL NOT APPLY: (I) IF AN OFFENDER COMMITS A CHARGEABLE OFFENSE DURING THE RESTORATIVE JUSTICE PROCESS THAT GOES BEYOND THE SCOPE OF SUBSECTION (B).(II) TO ANY COMMUNICATION RELATED TO THE MANDATORY REPORTING OF CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB1671PN2820 - 6 - 123456789